Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 6 RETAIL MARIJUANA LICENSE TYPES
44-10-603. Retail marijuana products manufacturer license - rules - definition.

A retail marijuana products manufacturer license may be issued to a person who manufactures retail marijuana products pursuant to the terms and conditions of this article 10.

A retail marijuana products manufacturer may cultivate its own retail marijuana if it obtains a retail marijuana cultivation facility license, or it may purchase retail marijuana from a licensed retail marijuana cultivation facility. A retail marijuana products manufacturer shall track all of its retail marijuana from the point it is either transferred from its retail marijuana cultivation facility or the point when it is delivered to the retail marijuana products manufacturer from a licensed retail marijuana cultivation facility to the point of transfer to a licensed retail marijuana store, a licensed retail marijuana products manufacturer, a retail marijuana testing facility, or a licensed retail marijuana cultivation facility with a centralized distribution permit pursuant to section 44-10-602 (7).

A retail marijuana products manufacturer shall not accept any retail marijuana purchased from a retail marijuana cultivation facility unless the retail marijuana products manufacturer is provided with evidence that any applicable excise tax due pursuant to article 28.8 of title 39 was paid.

A retail marijuana products manufacturer shall not:

Add any marijuana to a food product where the manufacturer of the food product holds a trademark to the food product's name; except that a retail marijuana products manufacturer may use a trademarked food product if the manufacturer uses the product as a component or as part of a recipe and where the retail marijuana products manufacturer does not state or advertise to the consumer that the final retail marijuana product contains a trademarked food product;

Intentionally or knowingly label or package a retail marijuana product in a manner that would cause a reasonable consumer confusion as to whether the retail marijuana product was a trademarked food product; or

Label or package a product in a manner that violates any federal trademark law or regulation.

A retail marijuana products manufacturer may sell retail marijuana and retail marijuana products to a retail marijuana hospitality and sales business.

Retail marijuana products must be prepared on a licensed premises that is used exclusively for the manufacture and preparation of retail marijuana or retail marijuana products and using equipment that is used exclusively for the manufacture and preparation of retail marijuana products; except that, if permitted by the local jurisdiction and subject to rules of the state licensing authority, a retail marijuana products manufacturer licensee may share the same premises as:

A medical marijuana products manufacturer licensee so long as a virtual or physical separation of inventory is maintained;

A commonly owned marijuana research and development licensee so long as virtual or physical separation of inventory and research activity is maintained; or

An accelerator manufacturer licensee if the retail marijuana products manufacturer has its premises endorsed pursuant to rule before each accelerator manufacturer licensee operates and each accelerator manufacturer licensee is approved to operate on that premises.

All licensed premises on which retail marijuana products are manufactured must meet the sanitary standards for retail marijuana product preparation promulgated pursuant to section 44-10-203 (2)(i).

The retail marijuana product must be sealed and conspicuously labeled in compliance with this article 10 and any rules promulgated pursuant to this article 10. The labeling of retail marijuana products is a matter of statewide concern.

The standard symbol requirements as promulgated pursuant to section 44-10-203 (2)(y) do not apply to a multi-serving liquid retail marijuana product, which is impracticable to mark, if the product complies with all statutory and rule packaging requirements for multi-serving edibles and complies with the following enhanced requirements to reduce the risk of accidental ingestion. A multi-serving liquid must:

Be packaged in a structure that uses a single mechanism to achieve both child-resistance and accurate pouring measurement of each liquid serving in increments equal to or less than ten milligrams of active THC per serving, with no more than one hundred milligrams of active THC total per package; and

The measurement component is within the child-resistant cap or closure of the bottle and is not a separate component.

Retail marijuana or retail marijuana products may not be consumed on the premises of a retail marijuana products manufacturer.

A retail marijuana products manufacturer may provide, except as required by section 44-10-203 (2)(d), a sample of its products to a facility that has a retail marijuana testing facility license from the state licensing authority for testing and research purposes. A retail marijuana products manufacturer shall maintain a record of what was provided to the testing facility, the identity of the testing facility, and the results of the testing.

An edible retail marijuana product may list its ingredients and compatibility with dietary practices.

A licensed retail marijuana products manufacturer shall package and label each product manufactured as required by rules of the state licensing authority pursuant to section 44-10-203 (2)(f) and (3)(b).

All retail marijuana products that require refrigeration to prevent spoilage must be stored and transported in a refrigerated environment.

A retail marijuana products manufacturer licensee may provide a retail marijuana product sample and a retail marijuana concentrate sample to no more than five managers employed by the licensee for purposes of quality control and product development. A retail marijuana products manufacturer licensee may designate no more than five managers per calendar month as recipients of quality control and product development samples authorized pursuant to this subsection (10)(a).

A sample authorized pursuant to subsection (10)(a) of this section is limited to one serving size of an edible retail marijuana product not exceeding ten milligrams of THC and its applicable equivalent serving size of nonedible retail marijuana product per batch as defined in rules promulgated by the state licensing authority and one-quarter gram of retail marijuana concentrate per batch as defined in rules promulgated by the state licensing authority; except that the limit is one-half gram of retail marijuana concentrate if the intended use of the final product is to be used in a device that can be used to deliver retail marijuana concentrate in a vaporized form to the person inhaling from the device.

A sample authorized pursuant to subsection (10)(a) of this section must be labeled and packaged pursuant to the rules promulgated pursuant to section 44-10-203 (2)(f) and (3)(b).

A sample provided pursuant to subsection (10)(a) of this section must be tracked with the seed-to-sale tracking system. Prior to a manager receiving a sample, a manager must be designated in the seed-to-sale tracking system as a recipient of quality control and product development samples. A manager receiving a sample must make a voluntary decision to be tracked in the seed-to-sale tracking system and is not a consumer pursuant to section 16 (5)(c) of article XVIII of the state constitution. The retail marijuana products manufacturer licensee shall maintain documentation of all samples and shall make the documentation available to the state licensing authority.

Prior to a manager receiving a sample pursuant to subsection (10)(a) of this section, a retail marijuana products manufacturer licensee shall provide a standard operating procedure to the manager explaining requirements pursuant to this section and personal possession limits pursuant to section 18-18-406.

A manager shall not:

Receive more than a total of eight grams of retail marijuana concentrate or fourteen individual serving-size edibles or its applicable equivalent in nonedible retail marijuana products per calendar month, regardless of the number of licenses that the manager is associated with; or

Provide to or resell the sample to another licensed employee, a customer, or any other individual.

A retail marijuana products manufacturing licensee shall not:

Allow a manager to consume the sample on the licensed premises; or

Use the sample as a means of compensation to a manager.

The state licensing authority may establish additional inventory tracking and record keeping, including additional reporting required for implementation. The retail marijuana products manufacturer licensee shall maintain the information required by this subsection (10)(h) on the licensed premises for inspection by the state and local licensing authorities.

For purposes of this subsection (10) only, "manager" means an employee of the retail marijuana products manufacturer who holds a valid key license or associated key license and is currently designated pursuant to state licensing authority rules as the manager of the retail marijuana products manufacturer.

A retail marijuana products manufacturer that uses an industrial hemp product as an ingredient in a retail marijuana product shall ensure that the industrial hemp product has passed all testing required by rules promulgated by the state licensing authority pursuant to section 44-10-203 (2)(d). Prior to taking possession of the industrial hemp product, a retail marijuana products manufacturer shall verify that the industrial hemp product passed all testing required for retail marijuana products at a licensed retail marijuana testing facility and that the person transferring the industrial hemp product has received a registration from the department of public health and environment pursuant to section 25-5-426.

Absent sampling and testing standards established by the department of public health and environment for the sampling and testing of an industrial hemp product, a person transferring industrial hemp product to a retail marijuana products manufacturer pursuant to this section shall comply with sampling and testing standards consistent with those established by the state licensing authority pursuant to this article 10. The state licensing authority shall report to the department of public health and environment any investigations or findings in violation of this section by a person registered pursuant to section 25-5-426.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a licensed retail marijuana products manufacturer may compensate its employees using performance-based incentives, including sales-based performance-based incentives.

A retail marijuana products manufacturer licensee that hosts an accelerator manufacturer licensee may, pursuant to rule, provide technical and compliance assistance to an accelerator manufacturer licensee operating on its premises. A retail marijuana products manufacturer licensee that hosts an accelerator manufacturer licensee may, pursuant to rule, provide capital assistance to an accelerator manufacturer licensee operating on its premises.

A retail marijuana products manufacturer licensee, pursuant to rule and the state licensing authority discretion, may be eligible for incentives through the department of revenue or the office of economic development and international trade, including but not limited to a reduction in application or license fees.

After obtaining passing test results required by subsection (6) of this section, a retail marijuana products manufacturer may transfer retail marijuana that has been extracted and is in a concentrated form to a co-located medical marijuana products manufacturer with at least one identical controlling beneficial owner and change the designation of the retail marijuana that has been extracted and is in a concentrated form to medical marijuana that has been extracted and is in a concentrated form. Pursuant to section 44-10-503 (12)(a), after the medical marijuana products manufacturer enters the designation change into the seed-to-sale tracking system, the product is a medical marijuana product and is the property of the medical marijuana products manufacturer. A product that changed designation pursuant to this subsection (15)(a) shall not be transferred to the originating retail marijuana products manufacturer or any retail marijuana licensee, have its designation changed from a medical marijuana product, or otherwise be treated as a retail marijuana product.

A transfer and change of designation of retail marijuana that has been extracted and is in a concentrated form to medical marijuana that has been extracted and is in a concentrated form pursuant to this subsection (15) is not a transaction that results in a right to refund of any retail marijuana excise tax incurred or paid prior to that transfer and change of designation.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2913, § 5, effective January 1, 2020 (see editor's note); (1)(e) added, (HB 19-1230), ch. 340, p. 3121, § 19, effective January 1, 2020.

L. 2020:

(2)(c), (13), and (14) amended, (HB 20-1424), ch. 184, p. 847, § 9, effective September 14.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (HB 21-1178), ch. 130, p. 525, § 7, effective September 7; (15) added, (HB 21-1216), ch. 306, p. 1834, § 4, effective July 1, 2022.

44-10-604. Retail marijuana testing facility license - rules.

A retail marijuana testing facility license may be issued to a person who performs testing and research on retail marijuana and industrial hemp as regulated by article 61 of title 35 and industrial hemp products as regulated by part 4 of article 5 of title 25. The facility may develop and test retail marijuana products, industrial hemp as regulated by article 61 of title 35, and industrial hemp products as regulated by part 4 of article 5 of title 25. Prior to performing testing on industrial hemp, a facility shall verify that the person requesting the testing has received a registration from the commissioner as required by section 35-61-104. Prior to performing testing on industrial hemp products, a facility shall verify that the person requesting the testing has received a registration as required by section 25-5-426.

The testing of retail marijuana, retail marijuana products, and retail marijuana concentrate, and the associated standards, is a matter of statewide concern.

The state licensing authority shall promulgate rules pursuant to its authority in section 44-10-202 (1)(c) related to acceptable testing and research practices, including but not limited to testing, standards, quality control analysis, equipment certification and calibration, and chemical identification and other substances used in bona fide research methods.

A person who has an interest in a retail marijuana testing facility license from the state licensing authority for testing purposes shall not have any interest in a licensed medical marijuana store, a licensed medical marijuana cultivation facility, a licensed medical marijuana products manufacturer, a licensed retail marijuana store, a licensed retail marijuana cultivation facility, or a licensed retail marijuana products manufacturer. A person that has an interest in a licensed medical marijuana store, a licensed medical marijuana cultivation facility, a licensed medical marijuana products manufacturer, a licensed retail marijuana store, a licensed retail marijuana cultivation facility, or a licensed retail marijuana products manufacturer shall not have an interest in a facility that has a retail marijuana testing facility license.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2917, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 44-12-405 as it existed prior to 2020.

44-10-605. Retail marijuana transporter license - definition.

A retail marijuana transporter license may be issued to a person to provide logistics, distribution, delivery, and storage of retail marijuana and retail marijuana products. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, a retail marijuana transporter license is valid for two years. A licensed retail marijuana transporter is responsible for the retail marijuana and retail marijuana products once it takes control of the product.

A licensed retail marijuana transporter may contract with multiple licensed retail marijuana businesses.

On and after July 1, 2017, all retail marijuana transporters shall hold a valid retail marijuana transporter license; except that an entity licensed pursuant to this article 10 that provides its own distribution is not required to have a retail marijuana transporter license to transport and distribute its products. The state licensing authority shall begin accepting applications after January 1, 2017.

A retail marijuana transporter licensee may maintain a licensed premises to temporarily store retail marijuana and retail marijuana products and to use as a centralized distribution point. The licensed premises must be located in a jurisdiction that permits the operation of retail marijuana stores. A licensed retail marijuana transporter may store and distribute retail marijuana and retail marijuana products from this location. A storage facility must meet the same security requirements that are required to obtain a retail marijuana cultivation facility license.

A retail marijuana transporter licensee shall use the seed-to-sale tracking system developed pursuant to section 44-10-202 (1)(a) to create shipping manifests documenting the transport of retail marijuana and retail marijuana products throughout the state.

A retail marijuana transporter licensee may:

Maintain and operate one or more warehouses in the state to handle retail marijuana and retail marijuana products; and

Deliver retail marijuana products on orders previously taken if the place where orders are taken and delivered is licensed.

There is authorized a retail marijuana delivery permit to a retail marijuana transporter license authorizing the permit holder to deliver retail marijuana and retail marijuana products.
(5) (a) (I) There is authorized a retail marijuana delivery permit to a retail marijuana transporter license authorizing the permit holder to deliver retail marijuana and retail marijuana products.

A retail marijuana delivery permit is valid for one year and may be renewed annually upon renewal of the retail marijuana transporter license.

A retail marijuana delivery permit issued pursuant to this section applies to only one retail marijuana transporter; except that a single retail marijuana delivery permit may apply to multiple retail marijuana transporters provided that the retail marijuana transporters are in the same local jurisdiction and are identically owned, as defined by the state licensing authority for purposes of this section.

The state licensing authority may issue a retail marijuana delivery permit to a qualified applicant, as determined by the state licensing authority, that holds a retail marijuana transporter license issued pursuant to this article 10. A permit applicant is prohibited from delivering retail marijuana and retail marijuana products without state and local jurisdiction approval. If the applicant does not receive local jurisdiction approval within one year from the date of the state licensing authority approval, the state permit expires and may not be renewed. If an application is denied by the local licensing authority, the state licensing authority shall revoke the state-issued permit. The state licensing authority has discretion in determining whether an applicant is qualified to receive a retail marijuana delivery permit. A retail marijuana delivery permit issued by the state licensing authority is deemed a revocable privilege of a licensed retail marijuana transporter. A violation related to a retail marijuana delivery permit is grounds for a fine or suspension or revocation of the delivery permit or retail marijuana transporter license.

A retail marijuana transporter licensee shall not make deliveries of retail marijuana or retail marijuana products to individuals while also transporting retail marijuana or retail marijuana products between licensed premises in the same vehicle.

A licensed retail marijuana transporter with a retail marijuana delivery permit may deliver retail marijuana and retail marijuana products on behalf of a retail marijuana store only to the individual who placed the order with a retail marijuana store and who:

Is twenty-one years of age or older;

Receives the delivery of retail marijuana or retail marijuana products pursuant to rules; and

Possesses an acceptable form of identification.

In accordance with this subsection (5) and rules adopted to implement this subsection (5), a licensed retail marijuana transporter with a valid retail marijuana delivery permit may:

Not accept orders on behalf of a retail marijuana store and may only pick up already packaged retail marijuana delivery orders from a retail marijuana store or its associated state licensing authority-authorized storage facility as defined by rule and deliver those orders to the appropriate individual;

Deliver retail marijuana and retail marijuana products not in excess of the amounts established by the state licensing authority;

Deliver only to an individual at the address provided in the order;

Deliver no more than once per day to the same individual or residence;

Deliver only to a private residence.

For purposes of this section, "private residences" means private premises where a person lives, such as a private dwelling place or place of habitation, and specifically excludes any premises located at a school or on the campus of an institution of higher education, or any other public property.

Deliver retail marijuana or retail marijuana products only by a motor vehicle that complies with this section and the rules promulgated pursuant to this section and section 44-10-203 (2)(dd); and

Use an employee to conduct deliveries on behalf of, and pursuant to a contract with, a retail marijuana store that has a valid retail marijuana delivery permit from its retail marijuana store or its associated state licensing authority-authorized storage facility as defined by rule.

Prior to transferring possession of the order to an individual, the person delivering the order shall inspect the individual's identification and verify that the information provided at the time of the order matches the name and age on the individual's identification.

Any person delivering retail marijuana or retail marijuana products for a retail marijuana transporter must possess a valid occupational license and be a current employee of the retail marijuana transporter licensee with a valid retail marijuana delivery permit; must have undergone training regarding proof-of-age identification and verification, including all forms of identification that are deemed acceptable by the state licensing authority; and must have any other training required by the state licensing authority.

Unless otherwise provided by the state licensing authority by rules promulgated pursuant to this article 10, all requirements applicable to other licenses issued pursuant to this article 10 apply to the delivery of retail marijuana and retail marijuana products, including but not limited to inventory tracking, transportation, and packaging and labeling requirements.

The advertising regulations and prohibitions adopted pursuant to section 44-10-203 (3)(a) apply to retail marijuana delivery operations pursuant to this subsection (5).

It is not a violation of any provision of state, civil, or criminal law for a licensed retail marijuana transporter licensee with a valid retail marijuana delivery permit, or such person who has made timely and sufficient application for the renewal of the permit, or its licensees to possess, transport, and deliver retail marijuana and retail marijuana products pursuant to a retail marijuana delivery permit in amounts that do not exceed amounts established by the state licensing authority.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this section, delivery of retail marijuana or retail marijuana products is not permitted in any municipality, county, or city and county unless the municipality, county, or city and county, by either a majority of the registered electors of the municipality, county, or city and county voting at a regular election or special election called in accordance with the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", article 10 of title 31, or the "Uniform Election Code of 1992", articles 1 to 13 of title 1, as applicable, or a majority of the members of the governing board for the municipality, county, or city and county, vote to allow the delivery of retail marijuana or retail marijuana products pursuant to this section.

An ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection (5)(i)(I) of this section may prohibit delivery of retail marijuana and retail marijuana products from a retail marijuana store that is outside a municipality's, county's, city's, or city and county's jurisdictional boundaries to an address within its jurisdictional boundaries.

The state licensing authority shall begin issuing retail marijuana delivery permits to qualified retail marijuana transporter applicants on, but not earlier than, January 2, 2021.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2918, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

L. 2022:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 22-1135), ch. 40, p. 212, § 2, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 44-12-406 as it existed prior to 2020.

44-10-606. Retail marijuana business operator license.

A retail marijuana business operator license may be issued to a person who operates a retail marijuana business licensed pursuant to this article 10, for an owner licensed pursuant to this article 10, and who may receive a portion of the profits as compensation.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2921, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 44-12-407 as it existed prior to 2020.

44-10-607. Retail marijuana accelerator cultivator license.

A retail marijuana accelerator cultivator license may be issued to a social equity licensee to exercise the privileges of a retail marijuana cultivation facility licensee on the premises of an accelerator-endorsed retail marijuana cultivation facility. The retail marijuana accelerator cultivator may receive technical assistance and financial support from the retail marijuana cultivation facility licensee with an accelerator endorsement.

The state licensing authority shall begin accepting applications for retail marijuana accelerator cultivator licenses on January 1, 2021.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2921, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1424), ch. 184, p. 847, § 10, effective September 14.

44-10-608. Retail marijuana accelerator manufacturer license.

A retail marijuana accelerator manufacturer license may be issued to a social equity licensee to exercise the privileges of a retail marijuana products manufacturer licensee on the premises of an accelerator-endorsed retail marijuana products manufacturer. The retail marijuana accelerator manufacturer may receive technical assistance and financial support from the retail marijuana products manufacturer with an accelerator endorsement.

The state licensing authority shall begin accepting applications for retail marijuana accelerator manufacturer licenses on January 1, 2021.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2921, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1424), ch. 184, p. 847, § 11, effective September 14.

44-10-609. Marijuana hospitality business license.

The state licensing authority may issue a marijuana hospitality business license authorizing the licensee to operate a licensed premises in which marijuana may be consumed pursuant to this article 10, rules promulgated pursuant to this article 10, and the provisions of the ordinance or resolution of the local jurisdiction in which the licensee operates.

Subject to provisions of this article 10 and the ordinance or resolution of the local jurisdiction in which the licensee operates, a retail food business as defined in section 25-4-1602 (14) that does not hold a license or permit issued pursuant to article 3, 4, or 5 of this title 44 may apply for a license to operate a marijuana hospitality business in an isolated portion of the premises of the retail food business. A retail food business operating a marijuana hospitality business pursuant to this subsection (1)(b) is subject to the terms and conditions of article 4 of title 25 and the rules promulgated pursuant to that article, including but not limited to licensure requirements and inspection and enforcement authority of the Colorado department of public health and environment. This subsection (1)(b) does not authorize the marijuana hospitality business to engage in the manufacture of medical marijuana-infused products or retail marijuana products or to add marijuana to foods produced or provided at the retail food business.

If a municipality, county, city, or city and county has in effect as of January 1, 2020, an ordinance or resolution related to consumption of marijuana, nothing in this section restricts the enforcement of that ordinance or resolution, and the local jurisdiction may, by ordinance or resolution, require a business operating as a place for on-site marijuana consumption to be licensed pursuant to this section.

The state licensing authority shall maintain a list of all marijuana hospitality businesses in the state and shall make the list available on its website.

A marijuana hospitality business shall not:

Engage in or permit the sale or exchange for remuneration of retail or medical marijuana, retail marijuana products, or medical marijuana-infused products in the licensed premises;

Allow on-duty employees of the business to consume any marijuana in the licensed premises of the business;

Distribute or allow distribution of free samples of marijuana in the licensed premises of the business;

Allow the consumption of alcohol on the licensed premises;

Allow the smoking of tobacco or tobacco products in the licensed premises of the business;

Allow the use of any device using any liquid petroleum gas, a butane torch, a butane lighter, or matches in the licensed premises if prohibited by local ordinance or resolution;

Allow any activity that would require an additional license under this article 10 in the licensed premises of the business, including but not limited to sales, manufacturing, or cultivation;

Knowingly permit any activity or acts of disorderly conduct as described in section 18-9-106;

Permit the use or consumption of marijuana by a patron who displays any visible signs of intoxication;

Permit rowdiness, undue noise, or other disturbances or activity offensive to the average citizen or to the residents of the neighborhood in which the licensed premises is located; or

Admit into the licensed premises of the business any person who is under twenty-one years of age.

A marijuana hospitality business shall:

Operate the business in a decent, orderly, and respectable manner;

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(b) is effective until January 1, 2023.] Require all employees of the business to successfully complete an annual responsible vendor training program authorized pursuant to section 44-10-1201;

(b)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(b) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

Require all employees of the business to have a valid responsible vendor designation, as described in section 44-10-1201;

Ensure that the display and consumption of any marijuana is not visible from outside of the licensed premises of the business;

Educate consumers of marijuana by providing informational materials regarding the safe consumption of marijuana. The materials must be based on the requirements established by the marijuana educational oversight committee, established pursuant to section 24-20-112 (4), and on the relevant research from the panel of health-care professionals appointed pursuant to section 25-1.5-110. Nothing in this subsection (3)(d) prohibits a local jurisdiction from adopting additional requirements for education on safe consumption.

Maintain a record of all educational materials required by subsection (3)(d) of this section in the licensed premises for inspection by state and local licensing authorities and law enforcement; and

If an emergency requires law enforcement, firefighters, emergency medical service providers, or other public safety personnel to enter a marijuana hospitality business, ensure that all employees and patrons of the business cease all consumption and other activities until such personnel have completed their investigation or services and have left the licensed premises.

A marijuana hospitality business and its employees may remove an individual from the business for any reason, including a patron who displays any visible signs of intoxication.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1230), ch. 340, p. 3121, § 20, effective January 1, 2020.

L. 2022:

(3)(b) amended, (HB 22-1222), ch. 111, p. 506, § 3, effective January 1, 2023.